Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Protection of Wyoming Interests

§ 9-14-101.
Second amendment defense.

The attorney general may seek to intervene or file an amicus curiae brief in any lawsuit filed in any state or federal court in Wyoming, or filed against any Wyoming citizen or firm in any other jurisdiction for damages for injuries as a result of the use of fire arms that are not defective, if in his judgment, the action endangers the constitutional right of citizens of Wyoming to keep and bear arms. The attorney general is directed to advance arguments that protect the constitutional right to bear arms. Before intervening in any lawsuit pursuant to this section, the attorney general shall obtain the approval of the governor.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 193, § 1.

§
9-14-102.
Unauthorized federal agency actions.

The legislature finds:

Rules enacted and other actions taken by a federal agency in excess of authority authorized by the United States congress acting within its powers under the United States constitution violate the constitution;

The federal environmental protection agency has increasingly expanded its rulemaking authority granted by the United States congress;

Current rulemaking and other actions of the federal environmental protection agency have severely impacted the ability of the state and its citizens to prudently develop the state’s natural resources;

The federal occupational safety and health administration has expanded its regulation of highly hazardous chemicals on questionable authority;

When rulemaking and other actions of the federal environmental protection agency or the federal occupational safety and health administration rest on questionable congressional authority the state is authorized to protect its interests and the interests of its citizens and should challenge those actions, including unlawful rulemaking.

The legislature declares it is the state’s policy to vigorously defend its interests and those of its citizens against rulemaking and other actions of the federal environmental protection agency or the federal occupational safety and health administration which are not authorized by the United States congress or which rest upon questionable authority.

The attorney general may seek to take action before the federal environmental protection agency, the federal occupational safety and health administration or in any state or federal court to stop the enforcement, administration or implementation of rulemaking or other actions taken by those agencies if, in his judgment, the rulemaking or other action exceeds the authority granted by the United States congress or otherwise rests on questionable authority. Before intervening in or initiating any lawsuit pursuant to this section, the attorney general shall obtain the approval of the governor.

History.

2014 ch. 94, § 1, effective March 10, 2014; 2017 ch. 72, § 1, effective March 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a), added (iv) and renumbered former (iv) as (v); added “or the federal occupational safety and health administration” following “environmental protection agency” in (a)(v), (b), and (c); and in (c) substituted “those agencies” for “that agency.”

Laws 2017, ch. 87, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 94, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2014.

§ 9-14-103.
COVID-19 vaccine mandate; prohibitions.

As used in this section:

“COVID-19” means as defined by W.S. 1-1-141(a)(ii);

“COVID-19 vaccination” means any vaccine that is marketed to prevent COVID-19 or any vaccine that is marketed to diminish or decrease the symptoms of COVID-19;

“Public entity” means as defined by W.S. 16-6-101(a)(viii) except that “public entity” does not include an entity receiving federal funding that by complying with subsection (b) of this section would lose that federal funding.

No public entity shall enforce any mandate or standard of the federal government, whether emergency, temporary or permanent, that requires an employer to ensure or mandate that an employee shall receive a COVID-19 vaccination.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, to the extent that this section conflicts with a federal law, regulation, rule, standard or order, subsection (b) of this section shall not be enforced after the federal law, regulation, rule, standard or order takes legal effect that requires Wyoming employers to comply with a federal COVID-19 vaccine requirement or mandate.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, subsection (b) of this section shall be enforceable during any period in which the federal law, regulation, rule, standard or order is subject to a federal judicial stay applicable in Wyoming or is otherwise repealed, withdrawn, superseded or declared by a federal court of competent jurisdiction to be unlawful or unenforceable.

History.

2021 66th Sp. Sess. ch. 1, § 2, effective November 12, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, 1st Sp. Sess., ch. 1, § 2 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved November 12, 2021.